Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5627YC (2) 91 ms/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 388.9, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Notwithstanding section 21.5, subsection 1 , the 3 governing body of a city utility or combined utility system, 4 or a city enterprise or combined city enterprise as defined in 5 section 384.80 , by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the 6 body or all of the members present at the meeting, may hold a 7 closed session to discuss proprietary information or marketing 8 and pricing strategies or proprietary information if its the 9 competitive position of the utility or a third party would be 10 harmed by the public disclosure of the marketing and pricing 11 strategies and such disclosure is not required of potential or 12 actual competitors , and if no public purpose would be served 13 by such disclosure or other utilities . The minutes and an 14 audio or audiovisual recording of a session closed under this 15 subsection shall be available for public examination at that 16 point in time when the public disclosure would no longer harm 17 the utilityâs competitive position. 18 Sec. 2. Section 388.9, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2026, 19 is amended to read as follows: 20 b. For purposes of this subsection section , âproprietary 21 informationâ includes customer records that if disclosed would 22 harm the competitive position of a customer or a utility ; or 23 information required by a noncustomer contracting party to 24 be kept confidential pursuant to a nondisclosure agreement 25 which relates related to electric transmission planning 26 and construction, critical energy infrastructure, electric 27 generation capacity planning, energy markets or prices, or an 28 ownership interest or acquisition of an ownership interest in 29 an electric generating facility, including but not limited to 30 information required to be kept confidential pursuant to a 31 nondisclosure agreement, or other information made confidential 32 by law or rule. 33